Alaska, session 34, SB258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 36.90 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 36.90.310. Software licenses. (a) Except for a contract entered into under 05 AS 36.30.300 - 36.30.320, a contract entered into by the state to license a software 06 application designed to run on generally available desktop or server hardware may not 07 limit the state's ability to install or run the software on desktop or server hardware of 08 the state's choosing. 09 (b) This section does not prohibit the state from 10 (1) entering into a contract that includes a restriction that is necessary 11 because of a federal accreditation requirement, a security certification requirement, or 12 the technical architecture of the software application; 13 (2) voluntarily purchasing bundled software, including cloud, hosting, 14 support, or related services, or from negotiating pricing discounts associated with 15 those purchases under a contract that does not otherwise restrict the state's ability to 01 install or operate the software application on desktop or server hardware of the state's 02 choosing; or 03 (3) voluntarily purchasing bundled software that is restricted by the 04 vendor for the purpose of discounted rates if the state determines in writing that the 05 restriction is in the best interest of the state. 06 (c) The commissioner of administration may adopt regulations to implement 07 this section. 08 (d) In this section, "state" has the meaning given to "state or a political 09 subdivision of the state" in AS 36.95.010. 10 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 11 read: 12 APPLICABILITY. AS 36.90.310, enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to a contract 13 entered into, renewed, or amended on or after the effective date of sec. 1 of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.